New York, session 2025-2026, A11021.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 12 of section 66 of the public service law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (n) to read as follows: 3 (n) (i) The commission shall, in their examination of any filing by a 4 utility that would result in a major change in rates or charges, in 5 addition to any other requirements of this chapter, consider the rate- 6 payer affordability of the filed schedule of rates or charges, with a 7 focus on cumulative rate impacts, the interests of low- and middle-in- 8 come utility customers, and minimizing residential energy burden. 9 (ii) The commission, upon the approval of any major change in rates or 10 charges, shall include in any approving order and make public on its 11 website, a written summary of the specific actions taken by the commis- 12 sion or department during the rate case or hearing to promote ratepayer 13 affordability, as identified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph. Such 14 summary shall include a detailed description of the specific actions and 15 strategies taken by the commission or department during the rate case or 16 hearing to address each of the required items, an evaluation of the 17 effectiveness or success of such actions, and any information demon- 18 strating such effectiveness or success. If the approving order for any 19 major change in rates or charges includes a multi-year rate plan, the 20 information required pursuant to this paragraph shall be provided for 21 each rate year individually and as an overview for the rate plan as a 22 whole. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 24 have become a law and shall not affect any proceedings relating to a 25 major change in rates or charges initiated on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15646-01-6